language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/hsb-upper-sorbian/upper_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_kuskec_magerowa_catalog_bvs_soblex_package_stiftung_wiki_retry__hsb_DE_soblex_w8_3.09.18.aff
FLAG num
SFX 0635 Y 71
SFX 0635 šće skaca ...
SFX 0635 šće skacaj ...
SFX 0635 šće skace ...
SFX 0635 šće skaceho ...
SFX 0635 šće skacej ...
SFX 0635 šće skaceje ...
SFX 0635 šće skaceju ...
SFX 0635 šće skacemu ...
SFX 0635 šće skach ...
SFX 0635 šće skachmoj ...
SFX 0635 šće skachmy ...
SFX 0635 šće skachu ...
SFX 0635 šće skacoh ...
SFX 0635 šće skacom ...
SFX 0635 šće skacu ...
SFX 0635 šće skacy ...
SFX 0635 šće skacych ...
SFX 0635 šće skacym ...
SFX 0635 šće skacymaj ...
SFX 0635 šće skacymi ...
SFX 0635 šće skaj ...
SFX 0635 šće skajmoj ...
SFX 0635 šće skajmy ...
SFX 0635 šće skajo ...
SFX 0635 šće skajtaj ...
SFX 0635 šće skajtej ...
SFX 0635 šće skajće ...
SFX 0635 šće skali ...
SFX 0635 šće skana ...
SFX 0635 šće skanaj ...
SFX 0635 šće skane ...
SFX 0635 šće skaneho ...
SFX 0635 šće skanej ...
SFX 0635 šće skaneje ...
SFX 0635 šće skaneju ...
SFX 0635 šće skanemu ...
SFX 0635 šće skani ...
SFX 0635 šće skanja ...
SFX 0635 šće skanjach ...
SFX 0635 šće skanjam ...
SFX 0635 šće skanje ...
SFX 0635 šće skanjemi ...
SFX 0635 šće skanjom ...
SFX 0635 šće skanjomaj ...
SFX 0635 šće skanjow ...
SFX 0635 šće skanju ...
SFX 0635 šće skanoh ...
SFX 0635 šće skanom ...
SFX 0635 šće skanu ...
SFX 0635 šće skany ...
SFX 0635 šće skanych ...
SFX 0635 šće skanym ...
SFX 0635 šće skanymaj ...
SFX 0635 šće skanymi ...
SFX 0635 šće skać ...
SFX 0635 šće skał ...
SFX 0635 šće skała ...
SFX 0635 šće skałe ...
SFX 0635 šće skało ...
SFX 0635 šće skałoj ...
SFX 0635 šće skaše ...
SFX 0635 šće skaštaj ...
SFX 0635 šće skaštej ...
SFX 0635 šće skašće ...
SFX 0635 šće šćemoj ...
SFX 0635 šće šćemy ...
SFX 0635 šće šćetaj ...
SFX 0635 šće šćetej ...
SFX 0635 šće šćeće ...
SFX 0635 šće šćeš ...
SFX 0635 šće šću ...

SFX 0636 Y 15
SFX 0636 i imi .
SFX 0636 i jach .
SFX 0636 i jam .
SFX 0636 i je .
SFX 0636 i jemi .
SFX 0636 i jeća .
SFX 0636 i jeći .
SFX 0636 i jećom .
SFX 0636 i jećomaj .
SFX 0636 i jećow .
SFX 0636 i jeću .
SFX 0636 i jo .
SFX 0636 i joch .
SFX 0636 i jom .
SFX 0636 i jow .

SFX 0637 Y 4
SFX 0637 ydom edmjo ....
SFX 0637 ydom edmjoch ....
SFX 0637 ydom edmjom ....
SFX 0637 ydom edmjomi ....

SFX 0638 Y 4
SFX 0638 ěsć esćo ...
SFX 0638 ěsć esćoch ...
SFX 0638 ěsć esćom ...
SFX 0638 ěsć esćomi ...

SFX 0639 Y 8
SFX 0639 i ja .
SFX 0639 i jach .
SFX 0639 i jam .
SFX 0639 i jemi .
SFX 0639 i jomaj .
SFX 0639 i jow .
SFX 0639 i ju .
SFX 0639 i ě .

SFX 0640 Y 4
SFX 0640 i jo .
SFX 0640 i joch .
SFX 0640 i jom .
SFX 0640 i jomi .

SFX 0641 Y 15
SFX 0641 cyle kale ....
SFX 0641 cyle kehole ....
SFX 0641 cyle kejele ....
SFX 0641 cyle kejle ....
SFX 0641 cyle kejule ....
SFX 0641 cyle kele ....
SFX 0641 cyle kemule ....
SFX 0641 cyle kichle ....
SFX 0641 cyle kile ....
SFX 0641 cyle kimajle ....
SFX 0641 cyle kimile ....
SFX 0641 cyle kimle ....
SFX 0641 cyle kohle ....
SFX 0641 cyle komle ....
SFX 0641 cyle kule ....

SFX 0642 Y 17
SFX 0642 a aj .
SFX 0642 a e .
SFX 0642 a ej .
SFX 0642 a eje .
SFX 0642 a eju .
SFX 0642 a i .
SFX 0642 a o .
SFX 0642 a oh .
SFX 0642 a oho .
SFX 0642 a om .
SFX 0642 a omu .
SFX 0642 a u .
SFX 0642 a ych .
SFX 0642 a ym .
SFX 0642 a ymaj .
SFX 0642 a ymi .
SFX 0642 a ón .

SFX 0643 Y 66
SFX 0643 a aca .
SFX 0643 a acaj .
SFX 0643 a ace .
SFX 0643 a aceho .
SFX 0643 a acej .
SFX 0643 a aceje .
SFX 0643 a aceju .
SFX 0643 a acemu .
SFX 0643 a ach .
SFX 0643 a achmoj .
SFX 0643 a achmy .
SFX 0643 a achu .
SFX 0643 a acoh .
SFX 0643 a acom .
SFX 0643 a acu .
SFX 0643 a acy .
SFX 0643 a acych .
SFX 0643 a acym .
SFX 0643 a acymaj .
SFX 0643 a acymi .
SFX 0643 a ana .
SFX 0643 a anaj .
SFX 0643 a ane .
SFX 0643 a aneho .
SFX 0643 a anej .
SFX 0643 a aneje .
SFX 0643 a aneju .
SFX 0643 a anemu .
SFX 0643 a ani .
SFX 0643 a anoh .
SFX 0643 a anom .
SFX 0643 a anu .
SFX 0643 a any .
SFX 0643 a anych .
SFX 0643 a anym .
SFX 0643 a anymaj .
SFX 0643 a anymi .
SFX 0643 a ał .
SFX 0643 a ała .
SFX 0643 a ałe .
SFX 0643 a ało .
SFX 0643 a ałoj .
SFX 0643 a eli .
SFX 0643 a eni .
SFX 0643 a enja .
SFX 0643 a enjach .
SFX 0643 a enjam .
SFX 0643 a enje .
SFX 0643 a enjemi .
SFX 0643 a enjom .
SFX 0643 a enjomaj .
SFX 0643 a enjow .
SFX 0643 a enju .
SFX 0643 a eć .
SFX 0643 a eše .
SFX 0643 a eštaj .
SFX 0643 a eštej .
SFX 0643 a ešće .
SFX 0643 a i .
SFX 0643 a imoj .
SFX 0643 a imy .
SFX 0643 a itaj .
SFX 0643 a itej .
SFX 0643 a iće .
SFX 0643 a iš .
SFX 0643 a u .

SFX 0644 Y 12
SFX 0644 0 a .
SFX 0644 0 ej .
SFX 0644 0 ijach .
SFX 0644 0 ijam .
SFX 0644 0 ije .
SFX 0644 0 ijemi .
SFX 0644 0 ijow .
SFX 0644 0 o .
SFX 0644 0 om .
SFX 0644 0 omaj .
SFX 0644 0 ow .
SFX 0644 0 u .

SFX 0645 Y 34
SFX 0645 ša sta ..
SFX 0645 ša staj ..
SFX 0645 ša ste ..
SFX 0645 ša steho ..
SFX 0645 ša stej ..
SFX 0645 ša steje ..
SFX 0645 ša steju ..
SFX 0645 ša stemu ..
SFX 0645 ša sto ..
SFX 0645 ša stoh ..
SFX 0645 ša stom ..
SFX 0645 ša stu ..
SFX 0645 ša sty ..
SFX 0645 ša stych ..
SFX 0645 ša stym ..
SFX 0645 ša stymaj ..
SFX 0645 ša stymi ..
SFX 0645 ša sće ..
SFX 0645 ša sći ..
SFX 0645 ša še ..
SFX 0645 ša šeho ..
SFX 0645 ša šej ..
SFX 0645 ša šeje ..
SFX 0645 ša šeju ..
SFX 0645 ša šemu ..
SFX 0645 ša ši ..
SFX 0645 ša šich ..
SFX 0645 ša šim ..
SFX 0645 ša šimaj ..
SFX 0645 ša šimi ..
SFX 0645 ša šo ..
SFX 0645 ša šoh ..
SFX 0645 ša šom ..
SFX 0645 ša šu ..

SFX 0646 Y 94
SFX 0646 a ach .
SFX 0646 a aj .
SFX 0646 a am .
SFX 0646 a e .
SFX 0646 a eho .
SFX 0646 a ej .
SFX 0646 a eje .
SFX 0646 a eju .
SFX 0646 a emi .
SFX 0646 a emu .
SFX 0646 a i .
SFX 0646 a j .
SFX 0646 a ja .
SFX 0646 a jaca .
SFX 0646 a jacaj .
SFX 0646 a jace .
SFX 0646 a jaceho .
SFX 0646 a jacej .
SFX 0646 a jaceje .
SFX 0646 a jaceju .
SFX 0646 a jacemu .
SFX 0646 a jach .
SFX 0646 a jachmoj .
SFX 0646 a jachmy .
SFX 0646 a jachu .
SFX 0646 a jacoh .
SFX 0646 a jacom .
SFX 0646 a jacu .
SFX 0646 a jacy .
SFX 0646 a jacych .
SFX 0646 a jacym .
SFX 0646 a jacymaj .
SFX 0646 a jacymi .
SFX 0646 a je .
SFX 0646 a jemoj .
SFX 0646 a jemy .
SFX 0646 a jetaj .
SFX 0646 a jetej .
SFX 0646 a jeće .
SFX 0646 a ješ .
SFX 0646 a ješe .
SFX 0646 a ještaj .
SFX 0646 a ještej .
SFX 0646 a ješće .
SFX 0646 a jmoj .
SFX 0646 a jmy .
SFX 0646 a jo .
SFX 0646 a jtaj .
SFX 0646 a jtej .
SFX 0646 a ju .
SFX 0646 a jće .
SFX 0646 a li .
SFX 0646 a oh .
SFX 0646 a om .
SFX 0646 a omaj .
SFX 0646 a ow .
SFX 0646 a ta .
SFX 0646 a taj .
SFX 0646 a te .
SFX 0646 a teho .
SFX 0646 a tej .
SFX 0646 a teje .
SFX 0646 a teju .
SFX 0646 a temu .
SFX 0646 a toh .
SFX 0646 a tom .
SFX 0646 a tu .
SFX 0646 a ty .
SFX 0646 a tych .
SFX 0646 a tym .
SFX 0646 a tymaj .
SFX 0646 a tymi .
SFX 0646 a u .
SFX 0646 a y .
SFX 0646 a ych .
SFX 0646 a ym .
SFX 0646 a ymaj .
SFX 0646 a ymi .
SFX 0646 a ć .
SFX 0646 a ća .
SFX 0646 a ćach .
SFX 0646 a ćam .
SFX 0646 a će .
SFX 0646 a ćemi .
SFX 0646 a ći .
SFX 0646 a ćom .
SFX 0646 a ćomaj .
SFX 0646 a ćow .
SFX 0646 a ću .
SFX 0646 a ł .
SFX 0646 a ła .
SFX 0646 a łe .
SFX 0646 a ło .
SFX 0646 a łoj .
