language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/hsb-upper-sorbian/upper_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_kuskec_magerowa_catalog_bvs_soblex_package_stiftung_wiki_retry__hsb_DE_soblex_w8_3.09.18.dic
njestyšće/0635
njetrěa/0646
njetča/0643
pižmoswini/0636
styšće/0635
swini/0636
sydom/0637
tajcyle/0641
tama/0642
tekstil/0644
tołša/0645
trěa/0646
tča/0643
utensil/0644
škri/0639
štyri/0640
šěsć/0638
